Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.165

Health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund—Priority for applications that reflect demographically underrepresented populations.

The office and the department of health shall prioritize a portion of any nonfederal balances in the health professional loan repayment and scholarship program fund for conditional loan repayment contracts for applications that reflect demographically underrepresented populations. Loan repayment contracts may include services provided in the community or at a designated site.

[ 2021 c 170 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 170: See note following RCW 71.24.887.